Missouri, session 2026, HB2477.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 393.2180, to read as follows:
393.2180. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of natural resources;
(2) "Solar project", a group of photovoltaic interconnected solar panels or
arrays that convert sunlight into electricity for the primary purpose of wholesale or
retail sales of generated electricity, including all on-site equipment and facilities
necessary for the proper operation of the facility, such as electrical collection and
transmission lines, battery storage systems, transformers, substations, and operations
and maintenance facilities.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning the effective
date of this section, there shall immediately be a moratorium placed on the construction
of any solar project in the state, including but not limited to the issuance of permits for
the construction of solar projects in the state.
3. For any solar project that is currently being constructed and for which
construction has not completed before the effective date of this section, all construction
of such solar project shall be suspended under the moratorium under this section.
4. The department shall promulgate rules relating to environmental issues
concerning, but not limited to, the construction, placement, and operation of a solar
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2477 2
project. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of the act, shall be invalid and void.
5. The moratorium under this section shall end on December 31, 2027. However,
if the department does not promulgate rules under subsection 4 of this section before
December 31, 2027, the moratorium shall continue until the requirements under
subsection 4 of this section have been met.
Section B. Because of the hazards relating to the construction and operation of solar
projects, section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within
the meaning of the constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon
its passage and approval.
✔